src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Pronouns in the Tembé language are words that may replace nouns or refer to participants in the conversation.

LEXICON Pronouns
pronoun    Cases   ;
he+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom:hê # ;
he+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Com:hêiruramo # "comigo" ;
he+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat:hêréhé # "por minha" ;

ne+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom:nê # ;
!ne+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Com:nêiruramo # "comigo" ;
ne+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dat:nêréhé # "por te" ;
ne+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dat:nêwé # "para ti" ;
ne+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Gen:nêwi # "de ti" ;

zane+Pron+Pers+Pl12+Nom:zanê # ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
